apertium-hye.hye.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
   <alphabet>ԱԲԳԴԵԶԷԸԹԺԻԼԽԾԿՀՁՂՃՄՅՆՇՈՉՊՋՌՍՎՏՐՑՒՓՔՕՖաբգդեզէըթժիլխծկհձղճմյնշոչպջռսվտրցւփքօֆև՞՛</alphabet>
   <sdefs>
     <sdef n="n"      c="Noun"/>
     <sdef n="adj"    c="Adjective"/>
     <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
     <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
     <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
     <sdef n="post"   c="Postposition"/>
     <sdef n="abbr"   c="Abbreviation"/>
     <sdef n="adv"    c="Adverb"/>
     <sdef n="np"     c="Proper noun"/>
     <sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/>
     <sdef n="ij"     c="Interjection"/>
     <sdef n="num"    c="Numeral"/>
     <sdef n="prn"    c="Pronoun"/>
     <sdef n="rel"    c="Relative"/>
     <sdef n="det"    c="Determiner"/>
     <sdef n="vblex"  c="Verb"/>
     <sdef n="vbser"  c="Verb 'to be'"/>
     <sdef n="vaux"   c="Auxiliary verb"/>

     <sdef n="tv"     c="Transitive"/>
     <sdef n="iv"     c="Intransitive"/>

     <sdef n="aa"     c="Animate"/>
     <sdef n="nn"     c="Inanimate"/>

     <sdef n="m"      c="Masculine"/>
     <sdef n="f"      c="Feminine"/>

     <sdef n="nom"    c="Nominative"/>
     <sdef n="acc"    c="Accusative"/>
     <sdef n="dat"    c="Dative"/>
     <sdef n="gen"    c="Genitive"/>
     <sdef n="loc"    c="Locative"/>
     <sdef n="abl"    c="Ablative"/>
     <sdef n="ins"    c="Instrumental"/>

     <sdef n="subst"  c="Substantivised"/>

     <sdef n="px1sg"  c="Possessive first person singular"/>
     <sdef n="px2sg"  c="Possessive second person singular"/>

     <sdef n="sp"     c="Singular / Plural"/>
     <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/>
     <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/>

     <sdef n="ant"    c="Anthroponym"/>
     <sdef n="top"    c="Toponym"/>
     <sdef n="al"     c="Altres"/>
     <sdef n="cog"    c="Cognomen"/>

     <sdef n="inf"    c="Infinitive"/>
     <sdef n="pass"   c="Passive"/>
     <sdef n="caus"   c="Causative"/>

     <sdef n="pprs"   c="Present participle"/>
     <sdef n="proc"   c="Process participle"/>
     <sdef n="pp"     c="Perfective participle"/>
     <sdef n="prsl"   c="Resultative participle"/>
     <sdef n="psub"   c="Subject participle"/>
     <sdef n="pneg"   c="Negative participle"/>
     <sdef n="pfup"   c="Future participle I"/>
     <sdef n="pfus"   c="Future participle II"/>

     <sdef n="pres"   c="Present"/>
     <sdef n="pii"    c="Imperfect"/>
     <sdef n="aor"    c="Aorist"/>
     <sdef n="imp"    c="Imperative"/>
     <sdef n="fts"    c="Future subjunctive"/>
     <sdef n="ftk"    c="Future perfect"/>
     <sdef n="cni"    c="Conditional future"/>
     <sdef n="cnk"    c="Conditional future perfect"/>

     <sdef n="mf"     c="Masculine / Feminine"/>
     <sdef n="nt"     c="Neuter"/>

     <sdef n="def"    c="Definite"/>
     <sdef n="ind"    c="Indefinite"/>
     <sdef n="dem"    c="Demonstrative"/>
     <sdef n="itg"    c="Interrogative"/>
     <sdef n="ord"    c="Ordinal"/>

     <sdef n="pers"   c="Personal"/>
     <sdef n="emph"   c="Emphatic"/>

     <sdef n="p1"     c="First person"/>
     <sdef n="p2"     c="Second person"/>
     <sdef n="p3"     c="Third person"/>

     <sdef n="sint"   c="Synthetic"/>
     <sdef n="pst"    c="Positive"/>
     <sdef n="comp"   c="Comparative"/>
     <sdef n="sup"    c="Superlative"/>

     <sdef n="cm"     c="Comma"/>
     <sdef n="apos"   c="Apostrophe"/>
     <sdef n="guio"   c="Hyphen"/>
     <sdef n="lpar"   c=""/>
     <sdef n="rpar"   c=""/>
     <sdef n="lquot"   c=""/>
     <sdef n="rquot"   c=""/>
     <sdef n="sent"   c="End of sentence marker"/>

   </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="guionet">    
      <e><re>[֊\-−]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">    
      <e><p><l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>`</l><r>՝<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>՝</l><r>՝<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">    
      <e><p><l>«</l><r>«<s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>»</l><r>»<s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="parenth">    
      <e><p><l>(</l><r>(<s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>)</l><r>)<s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aposchar">    
      <e><i>'</i></e>
      <e r="LR" i="yes"><p><l>’</l><r>'</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cometa">    
      <e><par n="aposchar"/><p><l></l><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">    
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">    
      <e><re>[.\?;։:!]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Suffixes -->

    <pardef n="poss">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ս</l><r><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>դ</l><r><s n="px2sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Abbreviations -->

    <pardef n="տ-ն__abbr">    
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Interjections -->

    <pardef n="այո__ij">    
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="և__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="որ__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="իսկ__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adpositions -->
   
    <pardef n="առանց__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="մեջ__post">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

    <pardef n="մի__det"> <!-- Check declension; maybe only declines as prn -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="այն__det"> <!-- Check declension; maybe only declines as prn -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="մեկ__subst">  <!-- i-type, plural in -er, inanimate -->
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ը</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ն</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ի</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ին</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ից</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ով</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ւմ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>եր</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>երը</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>երն</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>երի</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>երին</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>երից</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>երով</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>երում</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="բացի" c="except"><i>բացի</i><par n="և__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="և"><i>և</i><par n="և__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="Եվ"><i>Եվ</i><par n="և__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="կամ"><i>կամ</i><par n="և__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="նաև" c="also"><i>նաև</i><par n="իսկ__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="նույնպես" c="also"><i>նույնպես</i><par n="և__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ու"><i>ու</i><par n="և__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="եւ"><i>եւ</i><par n="և__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="թե"><i>թե</i><par n="և__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="բայց"><i>բայց</i><par n="և__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="քան" c="than"><i>քան</i><par n="և__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="որ"><i>որ</i><par n="որ__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="այլ"><i>այլ</i><par n="և__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="սակայն"><i>սակայն</i><par n="իսկ__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="այսինքն"><i>այսինքն</i><par n="իսկ__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="իսկ"><i>իսկ</i><par n="իսկ__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="ուրեմն"><i>ուրեմն</i><par n="իսկ__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="իսկ"><i>իսկ</i><par n="իսկ__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="ժամանակ"><i>ժամանակ</i><par n="իսկ__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="որովհետև"><i>որովհետև</i><par n="որ__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="եթե"><i>եթե</i><par n="որ__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="առանց"><i>առանց</i><par n="առանց__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="արտաքո"><i>արտաքո</i><par n="առանց__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="դեպի"><i>դեպի</i><par n="առանց__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="հաղագս"><i>հաղագս</i><par n="առանց__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ըստ"><i>ըստ</i><par n="առանց__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="մինչեւ"><i>մինչեւ</i><par n="առանց__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="որպեսզի"><i>որպեսզի</i><par n="առանց__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="աղագավ"><i>աղագավ</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="առաջ"><i>առաջ</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="դուրս"><i>դուրս</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="համար"><i>համար</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="հետ"><i>հետ</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="հետո"><i>հետո</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="հիման վրա"><i>հիման<b/>վրա</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="մեջ"><i>մեջ</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="միջև"><i>միջև</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="միջով"><i>միջով</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="նման"><i>նման</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="շուրջ"><i>շուրջ</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="չափ"><i>չափ</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="վեր"><i>վեր</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="վրա"><i>վրա</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="տակ"><i>տակ</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="փոխանակ"><i>փոխանակ</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="փոխարեն"><i>փոխարեն</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="մասին" c="about"><i>մասին</i><par n="մեջ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="մի"><i>մի</i><par n="մի__det"/></e>
    <e lm="այն"><i>այն</i><par n="այն__det"/></e>
    <e lm="այդ"><i>այդ</i><par n="այն__det"/></e>
    <e lm="այս"><i>այս</i><par n="այն__det"/></e>
    <e lm="այլ"><i>այլ</i><par n="մի__det"/></e>
    <e lm="այո"><i>այո</i><par n="այո__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="տ-ն"><i>տ-ն</i><par n="տ-ն__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="պ-ն"><i>պ-ն</i><par n="տ-ն__abbr"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="parenth"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
